Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,108
Registered cannabis establishment; conduct relating to cannabis for medical purposes; not an offense under state law; not subject to Uniform Controlled Substances Act; when.

(1) Subject to the requirements of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, it shall not be an offense under state law for a registered cannabis establishment, its employees, and its agents to possess, manufacture, distribute, deliver, and dispense cannabis for medical purposes, provided such conduct complies with applicable rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.

(2) Conduct protected by this section shall not be subject to the Uniform Controlled Substances Act.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, § 3.

Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see section 28-401.01.